Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.110

Investigations—Evidence—Subpoenas—Court orders of compliance.

(1) For purposes of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the director or any officer or employee designated by the director, may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the director finds to be relevant or material to the inquiry.

(2) If a person does not give testimony or produce the documents required by the director or a designated employee pursuant to a lawfully issued administrative subpoena, the director or designated employee may apply for a court order compelling compliance with the subpoena or the giving of the required testimony. The request for an order of compliance may be addressed to either: (a) The superior court of Thurston county or the superior court where service may be obtained on the person refusing to testify or produce, if the person is within this state; or (b) the appropriate court of the state having jurisdiction over the person refusing to testify or produce, if the person is outside the state.

[ 1986 c 14 s 11.]